Florida, session 2026, HB379.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 425.041, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
425.041 Prohibited fees, bylaws, tariffs, and policies.—A
cooperative which sells electricity at retail may not adopt,
enact, or enforce any fee, including a lot fee, developer fee,
or surcharge, or any bylaw, tariff, or policy, or take any other
action, that restricts or prohibits or has the effect of
restricting or prohibiting:
(1) The types or fuel sources of energy production which
may be used, delivered, converted, or supplied by the entities
listed in s. 366.032(1)(b)-(e) s. 366.032 (1) to serve
customers that such entities are authorized to serve.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb379-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 379 2026
(2) The use of an appliance, including a stove or grill,
which uses the types or fuel sources of energy production which
may be used, delivered, converted, or supplied by the entities
listed in s. 366.032(1). As used in this subsection, the term
"appliance" means a device or apparatus manufactured and
designed to use energy and for which the Florida Building Code
or the Florida Fire Prevention Code provides specific
requirements.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb379-00